Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7022.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6-13 of the General Laws entitled "Unfair Sales Practices" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
6-13-22. Notice required for credit card surcharges.
(a) Effective January 1, 2027, any business that imposes a surcharge or fee for payments
made by credit card shall provide clear and conspicuous notice of the surcharge to customers.
(b) The notice required pursuant to this section shall be posted in a conspicuous location at
the point of sale or payment.
(c) For restaurants or food service establishments, the notice shall also be clearly displayed
on all menus provided to customers.
(d) The notice shall include all of the following:
(1) A statement that a surcharge is imposed on credit card payments; and
(2) The amount or percentage of the surcharge.
(e) Failure to provide the required notice shall be considered an unfair or deceptive trade
practice and subject to enforcement under this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003875
========